Ohio, session 136, HB213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.926 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.926. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of interstate route number seventy between the eastern and western borders of Etna township, in Licking County, shall be known as the "Tuscarawas Valley Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.